Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202284-937
Least restrictive regulation, defined.

Least restrictive regulation means one of the following types of regulation, listed from least restrictive to most restrictive, consistent with the health, safety, and welfare of the public:

(1) Market competition;

(2) Third-party or consumer-created ratings and reviews;

(3) Private certification;

(4) Specific private civil cause of action to remedy consumer harm;

(5) Deceptive trade practices under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act;

(6) Mandatory disclosure of attributes of the specific goods or services;

(7) Regulation of the process of providing the specific goods or services to consumers;

(8) Inspection;

(9) Bonding or insurance;

(10) Registration;

(11) Government certification; and

(12) Occupational license.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 5.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.